Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-901.01
Revisor of Statutes; membership.

Until July 15, 1998, the Revisor of Statutes shall continue to serve as an associate member of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. On and after July 15, 1998, the Revisor of Statutes shall serve as a commissioner.

Laws 1998, LB 1158, § 3.